Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 19
INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR JUVENILES

Sec.

§ 16-1901. Compacts with other states authorized.

The governor of this state is hereby authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of the state of Idaho with any of the United States legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE XI

ARTICLE XII

ARTICLE XIII

§ 16-1902. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Interstate Compact for Juveniles.”